Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,166
Cease and desist order; hearing; appeal; injunction.

The director may issue an order directing a health maintenance organization or a representative of a health maintenance organization to cease and desist from engaging in any action or practice in violation of the Health Maintenance Organization Act. Within ten days after service of the cease and desist order, the respondent may request a hearing on the question of whether actions or practices in violation of the act have occurred. Such hearings shall be conducted as provided by the Administrative Procedure Act. The respondent may appeal the decision of the director, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. If the director elects not to issue a cease and desist order or in the event of noncompliance with a cease and desist order, the director may institute a proceeding to obtain injunctive or other appropriate relief in the district court of Lancaster County.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 75.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.